ru: Схема расположения светоотражающей ленты: 3 полосы; Biomotion; Шеврон; Горизонтальные полосы; Нет; Вертикальные полосы; X-образный на спине; Другое
hu: Fényvisszaverő szalag mintázata: 3 sávos; Biomotion; V-alakú (chevron); Vízszintes sávok; Nincs; Függőleges csíkok; X-hátú; Egyéb
en: Reflective tape pattern: 3-band; Biomotion; Chevron; Horizontal bands; None; Vertical stripes; X-back; Other
bg-BG: Светлоотразителна лента: 3-лентово; Биомоушън; Шеврон; Хоризонтални ленти; Няма; Вертикални ивици; X-образен гръб; Други
sv: Reflekterande tejpmönster: 3-bands; Biomotion; V-mönster (chevron); Horisontella band; Ingen; Vertikala ränder; X-rygg; Övrigt
ja: 反射テープパターン: 3バンド; バイオモーション; シェブロン; 水平バンド; なし; 垂直ストライプ; Xバック; その他
de: Muster des reflektierenden Bands: 3 Streifen; Biomotion; Zickzackmuster; Horizontale Streifen; Keine; Vertikale Streifen; X-Rücken; Sonstige
nb: Reflekterende tapemønster: 3 bånd; Biomotion; V-mønster; Horisontale bånd; Ingen; Vertikale striper; X-rygg; Annet
sk-SK: Vzor reflexnej pásky: 3-pásikový; Biomotion; Šípkový; Horizontálne pásy; Žiadne; Vertikálne pruhy; Prekríženie na chrbte (X); Iné
hr-HR: Uzorak reflektirajuće trake: 3 trake; Biomotion; Ševron uzorak; Vodoravne trake; Ništa; Okomite pruge; Uzorak X na leđima; Ostalo
nl: Reflectietape patroon: 3-bands; Biomotion; Chevron; Horizontale banden; Geen; Verticale strepen; X-rug; Overig
fr: Motif des bandes réfléchissantes: À 3 bandes; Biomouvement; Chevron; Bandes horizontales; Aucun; Rayures verticales; Dos en X; Autre
it: Motivo a nastro riflettente: 3 bande; Biomotion; Chevron; Bande orizzontali; Nessuno; Strisce verticali; A croce sul retro; Altro
cs: Vzor reflexní pásky: 3pruhový; Biomotion; Šípový vzor; Vodorovné pruhy; Žádný; Svislé pruhy; Zkřížená záda (X); Ostatní
ko: 반사 테이프 무늬: 3 밴드; 바이오모션; 갈매기 모양; 가로 밴드; 없음; 세로 스트라이프; X백; 기타
tr: Yansıtıcı bant deseni: 3 bantlı; Biomotion; V desenli; Yatay bantlar; Yok; Dikey çizgiler; X sırt; Diğer
el: Σχέδιο ανακλαστικής ταινίας: 3 λωρίδες; Βιοκίνηση; Ζιγκ ζαγκ; Οριζόντιες λωρίδες; Κανένα; Κάθετες ρίγες; Χιαστί στην πλάτη; Άλλο
pt-BR: Refletivo fita padrão: 3 faixas; Biomotion; Chevron; Faixas horizontais; Nenhum; Listras verticais; Costas em X; Outro
sl-SI: Vzorec odsevnega traku: 3-pasovni; Biomotion; Z vzorcem ševron; Vodoravni pasovi; Brez; Navpične proge; X-križanje na hrbtu; Drugo
lt-LT: Atspindinčios juostos raštas: 3 juostų; Biomotion; Ševronas; Horizontalios juostos; Nėra; Vertikalios juostelės; X formos nugaroje; Kitas
es: Patrón de cinta reflectante: 3 bandas; Biomovimiento; Chevrón; Bandas horizontales; Ninguno; Rayas verticales; Espalda en X; Otro
zh-TW: 反光膠帶圖案: 3 條帶; 仿生動態; V 形; 水平條帶; 無; 垂直條紋; 交叉背帶; 其他
th: ลวดลายเทปสะท้อนแสง: 3 แถบ; ไบโอโมชัน; ลายบั้ง; แถบแนวนอน; ไม่มี; ลายทางแนวตั้ง; ด้านหลังกากบาท; อื่นๆ
vi: Mẫu băng phản quang: 3 dải; Biomotion; Chữ V; Dải ngang; Không có; Sọc dọc; Lưng chữ X; Khác
ro-RO: Model de bandă reflectorizantă: 3 benzi; Biomotion; Chevron; Benzi orizontale; Niciunul; Dungi verticale; În formă de X pe spate; Altele
zh-CN: 反光带样式: 3 条带; 仿生运动设计; 人字纹; 水平条带; 无; 垂直条纹; X 型交叉; 其他
fi: Heijastava nauhakuvio: 3-raitainen; Biomotion; Nuolikuvio; Vaakaraidat; Ei mitään; Pystyraidat; X-selkämys; Muu
pt-PT: Padrão da fita refletora: 3 faixas; Biomovimento; Em espinha; Faixas horizontais; Nenhum; Riscas verticais; Costas em X; Outro
pl: Wzór taśmy odblaskowej: 3-pasmowy; Biomotion; Wzór szewronowy; Poziome pasy; Brak; Pionowe pasy; X-back; Inne
da: Refleksbånds mønster: 3-bånds; Biomotion; Chevron; Horisontale bånd; Ingen; Vertikale striber; Krydsryg; Andet